Utah statutes.
38-1a-504.   Construction liens on equal footing.

(1)  Construction liens on a project property are on an equal footing with one another, regardless of when the notices of construction lien relating to the construction liens are submitted for recording and regardless of when construction work for which the liens are claimed is provided.

(2)  Subsection (1) relates to the relationship between claimants' construction liens and does not affect the priority of a construction lender's mortgage or trust deed, as established under this chapter.

